Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202015-262
Census; city may take.

A city of the primary class may provide for and cause to be taken a census of the city.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, LXII, p. 143;

R.S.1913, § 4472;

C.S.1922, § 3857;

C.S.1929, § 15-260;

R.S.1943, § 15-262;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 72.
November 14, 2020